New York, session 2025-2026, S2370.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subsection (bbb) to read as follows: 3 (bbb) Credit for service dogs. (1) For taxable years beginning on or 4 after January first, two thousand twenty-five, a taxpayer shall be 5 allowed a credit as hereinafter provided, against the tax imposed by 6 this article, in an amount equal to the qualified service dog expendi- 7 tures made by the taxpayer. Provided, however, the credit shall not 8 exceed one thousand dollars. 9 (2) Tax credits allowed pursuant to this subsection shall be allowed 10 in the taxable year in which the expenditures were made. 11 (3) If the amount of the credit allowable under this subsection for 12 any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the 13 excess may be carried over to the following year or years, and may be 14 applied against the taxpayer's tax for such year or years, but shall not 15 exceed one thousand dollars. 16 (4) The term "qualified service dog expenditures" shall mean, for 17 purposes of this subsection, necessary expenses for maintaining a 18 service dog, as defined in subdivision seven of section forty-seven-b of 19 the civil rights law, including, but not limited to, food, veterinary 20 care, training, boarding, and clothing. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 22 years beginning on or after January 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05894-01-5